Massachusetts, session 194th, S2094.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 5 of Chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following clause: 
Twenty-Third, the exemptions available pursuant to clauses Twenty-second, Twenty-
second A, Twenty-second B, Twenty-second C, Twenty-second D, Twenty-second E and 
Twenty-second F shall be granted from the effective date of their claim from the Veterans 
Administration.   
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the Division of 
Local Services shall promulgate rules and regulations, as it pertains to overpayment of property 
taxes paid by exemption recipients after a Veterans Affairs disability letter is awarded.